Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1276.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8110(b) introductory paragraph, (e), (f) and (g) of Title 13 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added July 1, 2024 (P.L.430, No.41), are amended to read:§ 8110. Applicability; choice of law.* * *(b) When local law of securities intermediary's jurisdiction governs.--The [local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction, as specified in subsection (e),] law of this Commonwealth governs:* * *[(e) Determination of "securities intermediary's 12345678910111213141516171819202122 jurisdiction".--The following rules determine a "securities intermediary's jurisdiction" for purposes of this section:(1) If an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this chapter, this division or this title, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the securities account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the securities intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the entitlement holder's account is located.(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the securities intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the securities intermediary is located.(f) Factors not used to determine securities intermediary's jurisdiction.--A securities intermediary's jurisdiction is not 20250HB1276PN1429 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determined by the physical location of certificates representing financial assets, or by the jurisdiction in which is organized the issuer of the financial asset with respect to which an entitlement holder has a security entitlement, or by the location of facilities for data processing or other record keeping concerning the account.](g) When local law of issuer's or securities intermediary's jurisdiction governs.--The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction [or the securities intermediary's jurisdiction] governs a matter or transaction specified in subsection (a) [or (b)] even if the matter or transaction does not bear any relation to the jurisdiction.Section 2. Sections 8503(a), 8511 and 9305(a)(3) of Title 13 are amended to read:§ 8503. Property interest of entitlement holder in financial asset held by securities intermediary.(a) General rule.--To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary are held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities intermediary and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities intermediary.[, except as otherwise provided in section 8511 (relating to priority among security interests and entitlement holders).]* * *§ 8511. Priority among security interests and entitlement holders.[(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), if] If a securities intermediary does 20250HB1276PN1429 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not have sufficient interests in a particular financial asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements to that financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a security interest in that financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders other than the creditor have priority over the claim of the creditor.[(b) When creditor of securities intermediary has control over financial asset.--A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a security interest in a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has priority over claims of the securities intermediary's entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to that financial asset if the creditor has control over the financial asset.(c) Clearing corporations.--If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to a financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in that financial asset, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of entitlement holders.]§ 9305. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in investment property.(a) Governing law; general rules.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the following rules apply:* * *(3) The [local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction as specified in section 8110(e)] law of this Commonwealth governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a security interest in a 20250HB1276PN1429 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security entitlement or securities account.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1276PN1429 - 5 - 123